New Jersey, session 221, A5530.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. (New section) The Department of Corrections shall establish standards of habitability for all prison housing units, including but not limited to all Restorative Housing Units. The standards of habitability shall meet or exceed the standards of prison habitability established by the American Correctional Association. 2. The Department of Corrections shall adopt rules and regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), to effectuate the purposes of this act. 3. This act shall take effect on the 90th day following enactment.